Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 8.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-2608
Temporary registration.

The Secretary of State
may issue a temporary certificate of registration while an application for
registration or renewal of registration is pending.

Laws 2009, LB292, § 8.